Utah statutes.
53B-25-201.   Prohibited activities.

A postsecondary institution may not do any of the following:

(1)  request a student or prospective student to disclose a username and password, or a password that allows access to the student's or prospective student's personal Internet account; or

(2)  expel, discipline, fail to admit, or otherwise penalize a student or prospective student for failure to disclose information specified in Subsection (1).



Enacted by Chapter 94, 2013 General Session

